District of Columbia statutes.
34-1231

Repealed

Performance monitoring.

Repealed.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 32, 29 DCR 2872
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-210, § 3(f), 43 DCR 4702
Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 3, 49 DCR 7334
1981 Ed., § 43-1831.